District of Columbia statutes.
42-2704.10

District tax exemptions; payments in lieu; exceptions.

(a)

Assets and income of the Agency or of any entity established by the Agency pursuant to § 42-2703.01(20C) are exempt from District taxation. The Agency may make, at its discretion, payment in lieu of taxation.

(b)

Bonds and notes issued by the Agency and the interest thereon are exempt from District taxation except estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 410, 25 DCR 5008
Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-239, § 2(f), 49 DCR 11162
1981 Ed., § 45-2140.
1973 Ed., § 45-1925.
D.C. Law 14-239, in subsec. (a), substituted “of the Agency or of any entity established by the Agency pursuant to § 42-2703.01(20C)” for “of the Agency”.